California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(B) The designee shall make reasonable efforts to ensure compliance with all laws prohibiting the providing of alcoholic beverages to persons under 21 years of age by adult members of the party who are 21 years of age or older.

(C) If a person under 21 years of age is accompanied by a parent or legal guardian, then the parent or legal guardian shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that person complies with laws prohibiting the consumption of alcoholic beverages.

(D) A designee or, when present, the parent or legal guardian who fails to act reasonably shall be responsible for any reasonably foreseeable personal injury or property damage that is proximately caused by a violation of laws prohibiting the consumption of alcoholic beverages by a person under 21 years of age when alcoholic beverages are consumed during the provision of transportation services if the designee, parent, or legal guardian knew or reasonably should have known that the person is under 21 years of age and is consuming or has consumed alcoholic beverages during the provision of transportation services.

(E) Nothing in this paragraph limits the right of a designee to seek indemnity from any person, corporation, or other entity other than the charter-party carrier of passengers.

(F) Nothing in this section relieves a passenger of legal responsibility for his or her own conduct.

(7) (A) The designee shall read the following statement to those persons under 21 years of age:
“Consumption of alcoholic beverages by persons under 21 years of age is illegal. It is also illegal for an adult to provide alcoholic beverages to a person under 21 years of age. If you consume alcoholic beverages, this trip will be terminated and all payments for transportation services shall be forfeited and not subject to refund.”
(B) The terms of the statement required to be read pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be a part of the contract of carriage between the charter-party carrier of passengers and the chartering party.

(8) (A) If, during
 the course of providing transportation services, any person under 21 years of age is found to be, or to have been, consuming any alcoholic beverage, the designee shall immediately notify the driver and the driver shall terminate the trip. All passengers, including all passengers of a joint carriage if more than one party is participating in the trip, shall be brought back to the point of origin of the trip. All payment for transportation services shall be forfeited and not subject to refund.

(B) Should the designee, or when present, the parent or legal guardian, fail to inform the driver, or if the designee, parent, or legal guardian permits the drinking of alcoholic beverages by persons under 21 years of age to occur in the vehicle, the designee, parent, or legal guardian shall be subject to prosecution for violation of subdivision (a) of Section 25658 of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) If, at the time transportation is prearranged with the charter-party carrier of passengers, the chartering party discloses that alcoholic beverages will be served or transported in the passenger compartment, but that no member of the party is or will be under 21 years of age, each of the following applies:

(1) If the driver has reason to believe that passengers under 21 years of age will be present during transportation services, the driver shall verify the age of all passengers to be transported in the vehicle with the chartering party or designee.

(2) If any passenger is under 21 years of age, the failure to disclose the age of this passenger is a violation of the contract of carriage, and transportation services shall be terminated, and no refund given, unless all alcoholic beverages are removed and locked in the vehicle trunk or other locked compartment.

(d) If, at the time transportation is prearranged with the charter-party carrier of passengers, the chartering party discloses that a member of the party is under 21 years of age, but that no alcoholic beverages will be served or transported in the passenger compartment, each of the following applies:

(1) If the driver of the vehicle has reason to believe that alcoholic beverages are, or will be, transported in the vehicle and accessible to passengers, the driver shall verify whether alcoholic beverages were brought into the vehicle.

(2) If alcoholic beverages were brought into the vehicle without prior notification to the charter-party carrier of passengers, that act is a violation of the contract of carriage, and the transportation services shall be terminated, and no refund given, unless all alcoholic beverages are removed and locked in the vehicle trunk or other locked compartment.

(e) (1) If the driver is informed or learns that alcoholic beverages will be served or transported in the passenger compartment and a member of the party is under 21 years of age, the failure by the driver to do any of the following is a misdemeanor:

(A) To commence or continue transport without a designee who is 25 years of age or older present, unless the person who is under 21 years of age is accompanied by a parent or guardian.

(B) To commence transport without obtaining the designee’s signature or initials on the form described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b).

(C) To commence transport without the designee verifying to the driver that the designee has checked the identifications of all passengers to determine who
 is under 21 years of age and read the statement specified in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) to each member of the party who is under 21 years of age.

(D) To not terminate the trip and to return the chartering party to the place of origin if informed by the designee or, if present, a parent or guardian, that a person under 21 years of age is consuming or has consumed alcoholic beverages or by otherwise learning that a person under 21 years of age is consuming or has consumed alcoholic beverages.

(2) If the driver is informed or learns that alcoholic beverages will be served or transported in the passenger compartment and is informed that no member of the party is under 21 years of age, the failure to do any of the following is a misdemeanor:

(A) To fail to take reasonable steps to verify the age of any passenger
 reasonably believed to be under 21 years of age.

(B) To commence transport if a party member is under 21 years of age, unless all alcoholic beverages are removed and locked in the vehicle trunk or other locked compartment.

(C) To not terminate the trip and to return the chartering party to the place of origin if the driver learns that a person under 21 years of age is consuming or has consumed alcoholic beverages.

(3) If the driver is informed or learns that one or more members of the party are under 21 years of age and is informed that no alcoholic beverages will be served or transported in the passenger compartment, the failure to do any of the following is a misdemeanor.

(A) If the driver reasonably believes that alcoholic beverages were brought into
 the vehicle, to fail to take reasonable steps to verify that no alcoholic beverages were brought into the vehicle.

(B) To commence or continue transport if the driver learns that alcoholic beverages were brought onto the vehicle, unless all alcoholic beverages are removed and locked in the vehicle trunk or other locked compartment.

(f) A failure by the designee to do any of the following is a misdemeanor:

(1) To check the identifications of all passengers to determine who is under 21 years of age.

(2) To read the statement specified in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) to each passenger in the party who is under 21 years of age.

(3) To notify the driver of the vehicle if, at any time during
 the trip, a passenger in the designee’s party who is under 21 years of age is consuming or has consumed alcoholic beverages.

(4) Upon termination of a trip because of the consumption of alcoholic beverages by a person under 21 years of age, to safely return any person under 21 years of age who is a member of the designee’s party to his or her home, to take him or her to a location reasonably believed to be safer than his or her home, or to entrust him or her into the care of his or her parent or legal guardian.

(g) When present, the failure of a parent or guardian to notify the driver when a member of the party who is under 21 years of age and for whom the parent or guardian is responsible is consuming or has consumed alcoholic beverages during the provision of transportation services is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(h) If the commission, after a hearing, finds that a charter-party carrier of passengers or the driver of a charter-party carrier of passengers has violated this section, the commission shall do the following:

(1) For a first violation, the commission shall impose a civil penalty of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) upon the carrier, as determined appropriate by the commission.

(2) For a second violation, the commission shall impose a civil penalty of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) upon the carrier or may suspend the carrier’s certificate or permit for not more than 30 days, or both, as determined appropriate by the commission.

(3) For a third violation, the commission shall revoke the carrier’s certificate or permit.

(i) The authority granted the commission in subdivision (h) is in addition to any authority the commission has to enforce the requirements of this chapter, and the commission may impose any penalties available pursuant to this chapter for a violation of this section. 

(j) Nothing in this section shall change the liability of a party knowingly furnishing the alcoholic beverage to a person who they know or reasonably should know to be under 21 years of age.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 461, Sec. 4.   (AB 45)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5384.2.

(a) Every charter-party carrier of passengers shall furnish the commission annually with a list, prepared under oath, of all vehicles used in transportation for compensation during the preceding year. The list shall include and identify each modified limousine and the terminal location of each modified limousine. The commission shall furnish a copy of this list identifying each modified limousine and its terminal location to the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(b) The commission shall not issue or continue in effect any permit, certificate, or authority of a charter-party carrier of passengers that has not submitted fees required for inspection pursuant
 to Section 34500.4 of the Vehicle Code and any associated penalties, if applicable.

(c) Not later than January 1, 2015, the commission shall provide the Department of the California Highway Patrol with a list of each charter-party carrier’s modified limousines and their terminal locations in order for the department to promulgate regulations pursuant to Section 34500.4 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 860, Sec. 5.   (SB 611)   Effective September 30, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5384.3.

(a) For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Contract crew transportation vehicle” means a motor vehicle designed to transport 15 or fewer people, including the driver, that is owned, leased, operated, or maintained by a person contracting with a railroad corporation or its agents, contractors, subcontractors, vendors, subvendors, secondary vendors, or subcarriers, and used primarily to provide railroad crew transportation.

(2) “Crew transportation operator” means the person or entity that operates a contract crew transportation vehicle pursuant to a contract
 with a railroad corporation or its agents, contractors, subcontractors, vendors, subvendors, secondary vendors, or subcarriers.

(3) “Motor vehicle” has the same meaning as in Section 415 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) A crew transportation operator shall not operate a contract crew transportation vehicle without a valid permit, as determined by the commission.

(c) A crew transportation operator shall provide the commission with proof of insurance coverage that meets all of the following:

(1) Provides at least five million dollars ($5,000,000) in combined single limit coverage for bodily injury and property damage liability coverage.

(2) Provides at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) in uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage.

(3) Names the crew transportation operator as a named insured or an additional insured.

(d) This section does not apply to either of the following:

(1) Carpools, regardless if all persons work for a railroad corporation or not.

(2) Motor vehicles operated by an employee of a railroad
 corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 411, Sec. 1.   (SB 757)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5384.5.

If the driver of any charter-party carrier of passengers for hire operating under a valid certificate or permit, or any officer, director, agent, or employee of a charter-party carrier of passengers operating vehicles used in the transportation of passengers for hire under such a certificate or permit, is convicted of a violation of Section 23225 of the Vehicle Code, the commission, after a hearing, shall do the following:

(a) For a first offense, the commission may impose a civil penalty of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) upon the carrier, as determined appropriate by the commission.

(b) For a second offense, the commission may impose a civil penalty of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) upon the carrier or suspend the carrier’s certificate or permit for not more than 30 days, or both, as determined appropriate by the commission.

(c) For a third offense, the commission shall revoke the carrier’s certificate or permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 461, Sec. 5.   (AB 45)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5385.

A charter-party carrier of passengers, except those engaged in the provision of a hired driver service when a rented motor vehicle is being operated by the hired driver, shall not operate any motor vehicle on any public highway unless there is displayed on the vehicle a distinctive identifying symbol in the form prescribed by the commission, showing the classification to which the carrier belongs. Such an identifying symbol shall
 not be displayed on any vehicle until a permit or certificate of public convenience and necessity under this chapter has been issued to the carrier. The identifying symbol displayed by charter-party carriers subject to the Interstate Commerce Commission shall serve in lieu of the display requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 472, Sec. 8.   (AB 2572)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5385.7.

A charter-party carrier shall not operate a modified limousine, as defined in Section 5361, unless the modified limousine is equipped with emergency exits at the rear of the vehicle as required pursuant to Article 3.4 (commencing with Section 27375) of Chapter 5 of Division 12 of the Vehicle Code. The commission shall adopt rules to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 860, Sec. 7.   (SB 611)   Effective September 30, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5386.

(a) Every charter-party carrier of passengers, including a charter-party carrier that operates a limousine, shall include the number of its permit or certificate in every written or oral advertisement of the services it offers.

(b) For the purposes of this subdivision, “advertisement” includes, but is not limited to, the issuance of any card, sign, or device to any person, the causing, permitting, or allowing the placement of any sign or marking on or in any building or structure,
 or in any media form, including newspaper, magazine, radiowave, satellite signal, or any electronic transmission, or in any directory soliciting charter-party transportation services subject to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 701, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5386.5.

No charter-party carrier of passengers shall advertise its services, or in any manner represent its services, as being a taxicab or taxi service. For the purposes of this section, “advertise” includes any business card, stationery, brochure, flyer, circular, newsletter, fax form, printed or published paid advertisement in any media form, or telephone book listing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 658, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5387.

(a) It is unlawful for the owner of a charter-party carrier of passengers to permit the operation of a vehicle upon a public highway for compensation without (1) having obtained from the commission a certificate or permit pursuant to this chapter, (2) having complied with the vehicle identification requirements of Section 5385, and (3) having complied with the accident liability protection requirements of Section 5391.

(b) A person who drives a bus for a charter-party carrier without having a current and valid driver’s license of the proper class, a passenger
 vehicle endorsement, or the required certificate shall be suspended from driving a bus of any kind, including, but not limited to, a bus, schoolbus, school pupil activity bus, or transit bus, with passengers for a period of five years pursuant to Section 13369 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) (1) A charter-party carrier shall have its authority to operate as a charter-party carrier permanently revoked by the commission or be permanently barred from receiving a permit or certificate from the commission if it commits any of the following acts:

(A) Operates a bus without having been issued a permit or certificate from the commission.

(B) Operates a bus with a permit that was suspended by the commission pursuant to Section 5378.5.

(C) Commits
 three or more liability insurance violations within a two-year period for which it has been cited.

(D) Operates a bus with a permit that was suspended by the commission during a period that the charter-party carrier’s liability insurance lapsed for which it has been cited.

(E) Knowingly employs a busdriver who does not have a current and valid driver’s license of the proper class, a passenger vehicle endorsement, or the required certificate to drive a bus.

(F) Has one or more buses improperly registered with the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(2) The commission shall not issue a new permit or certificate to operate as a charter-party carrier if any officer, director, or owner of that charter-party carrier was an officer, director, or owner of a
 charter-party carrier that had its authority to operate as a charter-party carrier permanently revoked by the commission or that was permanently barred from receiving a permit or certificate from the commission pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) A peace officer, as designated pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, may impound a bus or limousine of a charter-party carrier of passengers for 30 days pursuant to Section 14602.9 of the
 Vehicle Code if the peace officer determines that any of the following violations occurred while the driver was operating the bus or limousine
 of the charter-party carrier:

(1) The driver was operating the bus or limousine of a charter-party carrier of passengers when the charter-party carrier of passengers did not have a permit or certificate issued by the commission.

(2) The driver was operating the bus or
 limousine of a charter-party carrier
 of passengers when the charter-party carrier of passengers was operating with a suspended permit or certificate from the commission.

(3) The driver was operating the bus or limousine of a charter-party carrier of passengers without having a current and valid driver’s license of the proper class, a passenger vehicle endorsement, or the required certificate.

(e) This section does not authorize the impoundment of privately owned personal vehicles that are not common carriers nor the impoundment of vehicles used in transportation for compensation by charter-party carriers of passengers that are not required to carry individual permits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 718, Sec. 9.5.   (SB 541)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5387.3.

(a) A charter-party carrier described in subdivision (c) of Section 5387, that has received a notice of refusal or revocation of its permit to operate, may submit to the commission, within 15 days after the mailing of the notice, a written request for a hearing. The charter-party carrier shall furnish a copy of the request to the Department of the California Highway Patrol at the same time that it makes its request for a hearing to the commission. Failure to request a
 hearing, in writing, within the 15-day period is a waiver of the right to a hearing.

(b) Upon receipt by the commission of the hearing request, the commission shall hold a hearing within a reasonable time, not to exceed 21 days, and may appoint a hearing officer to conduct the hearing. At the hearing, the burden of proof is on the charter-party carrier to prove that it was not in violation of subdivision (c) of Section 5387.

(c) The refusal to, or revocation of, the permit to operate, may only be rescinded by the hearing officer if the charter-party carrier proves that it was not in violation of subdivision (c) of Section 5387, and that the basis of the refusal or revocation resulted from a factual error.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 248, Sec. 2.   (AB 636)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

5387.5.

When the commission or an employee of the commission determines that any person or corporation is holding itself out as a charter-party carrier of passengers without a certificate or permit to so operate, the carrier shall pay the commission the fee established pursuant to Section 421 for the period during which it operated without authority, up to a maximum of three years, which fee shall be deposited in the Public Utilities Commission Transportation Reimbursement Account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 518, Sec. 2.5.   Effective August 13, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

5389.

(a) The commission, each commissioner, and each officer and person employed by the commission may, at any time have access to the land, buildings, or equipment of a charter-party carrier of passengers used in connection with the operation of its business and may inspect the accounts, books, papers, and documents of the carrier. Any inspection by the commission may include photocopying or the electrostatic or photostatic reproduction of documents either at the premises of the carrier or the offices of the commission, at the option of the carrier. The commission shall reimburse the carrier for any copying or
 reproduction expenses incurred by it at the direction of the commission.

(b) Subdivision (a) also applies to access to property and inspections of the accounts, books, papers, and documents of any business which is a subsidiary or affiliate of, or a corporation which holds a controlling interest in, a charter-party carrier of passengers with respect to any transaction between the carrier and the subsidiary, affiliate, or holding corporation.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) also apply to any person or corporation engaged in the transportation of persons by motor vehicle for compensation, which the commission, or an officer or person employed by the commission, determines is holding itself out as a charter-party carrier of passengers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 518, Sec. 2.4.   Effective August 13, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Accident Liability Protection [5391. - 5395.]

5391.

The commission shall, in granting permits or a certificate pursuant to this chapter, require the charter-party carrier of passengers to procure, and to continue in effect during the life of the permit or certificate, adequate protection against liability imposed by law upon the charter-party carrier of passengers for the payment of damages for personal bodily injuries, including death resulting therefrom, protection against a total liability of the charter-party carrier of passengers on account of bodily injuries to, or death of, more than one person as a result of any one accident, and protection against damage or destruction of property. The minimum requirements for such assurances of protection against liability shall not be less than the requirements which are applicable to operations conducted under certificates of public convenience and necessity issued pursuant to the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1031), Chapter 5, Part 1, Division 1, of this code, and the rules and regulations prescribed pursuant thereto shall apply to charter-party carriers of passengers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

5391.2.

Notwithstanding Section 5391, in granting certificates to the holders of class C certificates, the commission shall require that those carriers procure and continue in effect adequate protection against liability imposed by law upon the carrier for the payment of damages for personal bodily injuries, including death resulting therefrom; protection against a total liability of the carrier of passengers on account of bodily injuries to, or death of, more than one person as a result of any one accident; and protection against damage or destruction of property. The requirement of that assurance of protection against liability shall be seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) per accident.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 125, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5391.5.

The commission shall commence a rulemaking proceeding to develop uniform operating standards applicable to charter-party carriers of passengers. The rulemaking proceeding shall include, but shall not be limited to, a consideration of all of the following issues:

(a) Whether current insurance limits provide sufficient liability coverage for charter-party carriers to operate to any point in this state.

(b) Whether the commission’s requirements concerning the maintenance of records is sufficient to permit the safe operation of charter-party carriers to any point in this state.

(c) Whether the commission’s current procedures for the issuance of operating authority are creating unnecessary congestion upon the roads of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 518, Sec. 3.   Effective August 13, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

5392.

(a) The protection required under Sections 5391 and 5391.2 shall be evidenced by the deposit of any of the following with the commission covering each vehicle used or to be used under the certificate or permit applied for:

(1) A policy of insurance, issued by a company licensed to write insurance in this state, or by nonadmitted insurers subject to Section 1763 of the Insurance Code, if the policies meet the rules promulgated therefor by the commission.

(2) A bond of a surety company licensed to write surety bonds in the state.

(3) Evidence of the
 qualification of the charter-party carrier of passengers as a self-insurer as may be authorized by the commission.

(b) This section applies only to the driver supplied by a charter-party carrier of passengers engaged in the provision of a hired driver service when a rented motor vehicle is being operated by the hired driver. The requirements of this section do not apply to the separately rented vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 472, Sec. 9.   (AB 2572)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5392.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any charter-party carrier of passengers that contracts to provide a vanpool vehicle, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 17149 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, to an employer or a group of employees for the purpose of operating that vehicle for transportation to and from work shall maintain protection against liability with respect to that vehicle in the same form and amount as described in Section 5391.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 622, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5392.5.

No person, firm, or corporation holding a valid permit issued by the commission pursuant to this chapter shall be required by any agency of local government to provide insurance in a manner different from that required by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 109, Sec. 6.   Effective June 27, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5393.

With the consent of the commission a copy of an insurance policy, certified by the company issuing it to be a true copy of the original policy, or a photostatic copy thereof, or an abstract of the provisions of the policy, or a certificate of insurance issued by the company issuing the policy, may be filed with the commission in lieu of the original or a duplicate or counterpart of the policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 823.)
-------------------------------------------

5395.

A school, school district, or the state is not liable for transportation services provided by an operator of a charter-party carrier operating a motor vehicle as specified in subdivision (k) of Section 545 of the Vehicle Code for which the school or school district has not contracted, arranged, or otherwise provided.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5384.2 (as added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 649, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 446.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Basis of Charges [5401. - 5402.]

5401.

Charges for the transportation to be offered or afforded by a charter-party carrier of passengers shall be computed and assessed on a vehicle mileage or time of use basis, or on a combination thereof. These charges may vary in accordance with the passenger capacity of the vehicle, or the size of the group to be transported. However, no charter-party carrier of passengers shall, directly or through an agent or otherwise, nor shall any broker, contract, agree, or arrange to charge, or demand or receive compensation, for the transportation offered or afforded that shall be computed, charged, or assessed on an individual-fare basis, except schoolbus contractors who are compensated by parents of children attending public, private, or parochial schools and except operators of round-trip sightseeing tour services conducted under a certificate subject to Section 5371.1, or a permit issued pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5384.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 456, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5402.

No person, partnership, corporation, or organization shall sell transportation by a passenger stage on an individual-fare basis for a sightseeing trip in California on a route for which a passenger stage corporation has obtained a certificate of convenience and necessity if the seller intends to charter or charters the passenger stage in California at a rate per passenger which is less than the individual fare for which the transportation is sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Fines and Penalties [5411. - 5420.]

5411.

Every charter-party carrier of passengers and every officer, director, agent, or employee of any charter-party carrier of passengers who violates or who fails to comply with, or who procures, aids, or abets any violation by any charter-party carrier of passengers of any provision of this chapter, or who fails to obey, observe, or comply with any order, decision, rule, regulation, direction, demand, or requirement of the
 commission, or of any operating permit or certificate issued to any charter-party carrier of passengers, or who procures, aids, or abets any charter-party carrier of passengers in its failure to obey, observe, or comply with any such order, decision, rule, regulation, direction, demand, requirement, or operating permit or certificate, is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than three months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 204.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5411.3.

Every charter-party carrier of passengers, and every officer, director, agent, or employee of a charter-party carrier of passengers, who displays on any vehicle any identifying symbol other than one prescribed by the commission pursuant to Section 5385, or who fails to remove an identifying symbol when required by the commission, is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not more than two thousand five hundred
 dollars ($2,500), by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 263, Sec. 4.   (AB 951)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

5411.5.

(a) Whenever a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, arrests a person for operation of a charter-party carrier of passengers without a valid certificate or permit, the peace officer may impound and retain possession of the vehicle.

(b) Whenever a peace officer, as
 defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, arrests a person for operating a charter-party carrier of passengers as a taxicab in violation of an ordinance or resolution of a city, county, or city and county, the peace officer may impound and retain possession of the vehicle.

(c) If the vehicle is seized from a person who is not the owner of the vehicle, the impounding authority shall immediately give notice to the owner by first-class mail.

(d) The vehicle shall immediately be returned to the owner if the infraction or violation is not prosecuted or is dismissed, the owner is found not guilty of the offense, or it is determined that the vehicle was used in violation of Section 5411 without the knowledge and consent of the owner. The vehicle shall be returned to the owner upon payment of any fine ordered by the court. If the vehicle
 is seized due to a violation of a person other than the owner of the vehicle, the vehicle shall be returned to the owner after all impoundment fees are paid. After the expiration of six weeks from the final disposition of the criminal case, unless the owner is in the process of making payments to the court, the impounding authority may deal with the vehicle as lost or abandoned property under Section 1411 of the Penal Code.

(e) At any time, a person may make a motion in superior court for the immediate return of the vehicle on the ground that there was no probable cause to seize it or that there is some other good cause, as determined by the court, for the return of the vehicle. A proceeding under this section is a limited civil case.

(f) No peace officer, however, may impound any vehicle owned or operated by a nonprofit organization exempt from taxation pursuant to Section
 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code which serves youth or senior citizens and provides transportation incidental to its programs or services or a rented motor vehicle that is being operated by a hired driver of a charter-party carrier of passengers that is providing hired driver service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 472, Sec. 10.   (AB 2572)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5411.6.

Every charter party carrier of passengers and every officer, director, agent, or employee of a charter party carrier of passengers who knowingly and willfully makes a false statement of the carrier’s gross operating revenues in order to underpay the commission’s reimbursement fees is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 927, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

5412.

Every corporation or person other than a charter-party carrier of passengers, who knowingly and willfully, either individually, or acting as an officer, agent, or employee of a corporation, copartnership, or any other person other than a charter-party carrier of passengers, violates any provision of this chapter or fails to observe, obey, or comply with any order, decision, rule, regulation, direction, demand, or requirement of
 the commission, or who procures, aids, or abets any charter-party carrier of passengers in its violation of this chapter, or in its failure to obey, observe, or comply with any such order, decision, rule, regulation, direction, demand, or requirement, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than three months, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 263, Sec. 5.   (AB 951)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

5412.2.

(a) When a person is convicted of the offense of operating a taxicab without a valid certificate or permit, in addition to any other penalties provided by law, if the court determines the operator has the ability to pay, the court shall impose a mandatory fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for a first conviction or five thousand dollars ($5,000) for a subsequent conviction.

(b) When a person is convicted of the offense of operating a charter-party carrier of passengers without a valid certificate or permit, in addition to any other penalties provided by law, if the court determines the operator has the ability to pay, the court shall impose a mandatory fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for a first conviction or twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for a subsequent conviction.

(c) As used in this section, “taxicab” means a passenger vehicle designed for carrying not more than eight persons, excluding the driver, and used to carry passengers for hire. “Taxicab” shall not include a charter-party carrier of passengers within the meaning of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 263, Sec. 6.   (AB 951)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

5412.5.

Every officer or person employed by the commission who, except as authorized by the commission or a court, discloses any fact or information from an inspection of the accounts, books, papers, or documents of a charter-party carrier of passengers is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than three months, or by both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 472, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

5413.

Every charter-party carrier of passengers and every officer, director, agent, or employee of any charter-party carrier of passengers who violates or who fails to comply with, or who procures, aids, or abets, any violation by any charter-party carrier of passengers of any provision of this chapter, or who fails to obey, observe, or comply with any order, decision, rule, regulation, direction, demand, or requirement of the